District of Columbia statutes.
32-1123

Establishment of Office of Occupational Safety and Health; promulgation of rules and regulations.

Upon approval of the plan by the Secretary, the Mayor shall have 2 years to establish the Office of Occupational Safety and Health and to promulgate rules to carry out the provisions of this chapter. Nothing in this chapter shall affect any requirements imposed upon the Mayor by the subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-186, § 24, 35 DCR 8250
1981 Ed., § 36-1223.
Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 7-186, the “District of Columbia Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1988”, see Mayor’s Order 89-121, May 31, 1989.
Section effective: Section 26 (a) of D.C. Law 7-186 (§ 32-1124(a)) provided that §§ 36-1202, 36-1203, 36-1205 to 36-1223 (§§ 32-1102, 32-1103, 32-1105 to 32-1123, 2001 Ed.), and the repeal of subchapter II of Chapter 2 of Title 36 (Chapter 8 of Title 32, 2001 Ed.) shall apply 2 years after approval of the plan by the Secretary.